Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.06.040

Abandonment—Resolution or petition for election.

(1) Upon the passage of a resolution of the legislative body of a noncharter code city, or upon the filing of a sufficient petition with the county auditor signed by registered voters in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast at the last general municipal election therein, proposing abandonment by the city of the plan of government under which it is then operating and adoption of another plan, naming such plan and its effective date, the sufficiency of the petition for abandonment shall be determined, an election ordered and conducted, and the results declared generally as provided in chapter 35A.02 RCW insofar as such provisions are applicable. If the resolution or petition proposes a plan of government other than those authorized in chapters 35A.12 RCW and 35A.13 RCW of this title, the resolution or petition shall specify the class under which such city will be classified upon adoption of such plan.

(2) A resolution proposing abandonment of a city's current plan of government and the adoption of a council-manager plan of government under subsection (1) of this section may be combined with a resolution proposing to designate the person elected to council position one as the chair of the council as described in RCW 35A.13.033, and such a combined proposal may be placed before the voters of the city as a single proposition.

[ 2022 c 30 s 1; 1990 c 259 s 4; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.06.040.]

NOTES:

Sufficiency of petition in code city: RCW 35A.01.040.